Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances
§ 35-7-1031.
Unlawful manufacture or delivery; counterfeit substance; unlawful possession.

Except as authorized by this act, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance. Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:

Methamphetamine or a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), or both;

Any other controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II or III, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten (10) years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both;

A substance classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than two (2) years, fined not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), or both;

A substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

Except as authorized by this act, it is unlawful for any person to create, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver, a counterfeit substance. Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:

A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), or both;

Any other counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, II or III, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten (10) years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both;

A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than two (2) years, fined not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), or both;

A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this act. With the exception of any drug that has received final approval from the United States food and drug administration, including dronabinol as listed in W.S. 35-7-1018(h), and notwithstanding any other provision of this act, no practitioner shall dispense or prescribe marihuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or synthetic equivalents of marihuana or tetrahydrocannabinol. No prescription or practitioner’s order for marihuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or synthetic equivalents of marihuana or tetrahydrocannabinol shall be valid, unless the prescription is for a drug that has received final approval from the United States food and drug administration, including dronabinol. Any person who violates this subsection:

And has in his possession a controlled substance in the amount set forth in this paragraph is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than twelve (12) months, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both. Any person convicted for a third or subsequent offense under this paragraph, including convictions for violations of similar laws in other jurisdictions, shall be imprisoned for a term not more than five (5) years, fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both. For purposes of this paragraph, the amounts of a controlled substance are as follows:

For a controlled substance in plant form, no more than three (3) ounces;

For a controlled substance in liquid form, no more than three-tenths (3/10) of a gram;

For a controlled substance in powder or crystalline form, no more than three (3) grams;

For a controlled substance in pill or capsule form, no more than three (3) grams;

For a controlled substance in the form of cocaine-based “crack” cocaine, no more than five-tenths (5/10) of a gram;

For a controlled substance known as LSD (Lysergic acid diethylamide), no more than three-tenths (3/10) of a gram.

And has in his possession methamphetamine or a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug in an amount greater than those set forth in paragraph (c)(i) of this section, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than seven (7) years, a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00), or both;

And has in his possession any other controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II or III in an amount greater than set forth in paragraph (c)(i) of this section, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both;

And has in his possession a controlled substance classified in Schedule IV in an amount greater than set forth in paragraph (c)(i) of this section, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), or both;

And has in his possession a controlled substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

For purposes of determining the weights to be given the controlled substances under this section, the weights designated in this section shall include the weight of the controlled substance and the weight of any carrier element, cutting agent, diluting agent or any other substance excluding packaging material.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.31; Laws 1985, ch. 44, § 1; 1995, ch. 61, § 1; 1996, ch. 66, § 1; 1998, ch. 62, § 1; 2004, ch. 87, § 1; 2011, ch. 66, § 1; 2018 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c)(i), inserted “including convictions for violations of similar laws in other jurisdictions” preceeding “shall be imprisoned for a term not more than five (5) years.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (c), added the present second sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (c), inserted “any drug that has received final approval from the United States food and drug administration, including,” in the second sentence, “unless the prescription is for a drug that has received final approval from the United States food and drug administration, including dronabinol” in the third sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Conspiracy to deliver controlled substance.—

There was sufficient evidence to support defendant’s conviction for conspiracy to delivery a controlled substance such that a jury could reasonably infer from the facts before it that defendant had an individual connection with, and an appreciable ability to guide the destiny of the over 74 pounds of marijuana found in his compact car packaged in a form consistent with delivery, and producing a strong smell. Mitchell v. State, 2020 WY 142, 476 P.3d 224,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2020).

Probable cause existed to issue warrant.

If a deputy unconstitutionally searched defendant’s camper by looking through one window, the search was not invalid because evidence the deputy saw in an uncontested view through another window established probable cause to search the camper by describing the presence of potential drugs and paraphernalia, establishing probable cause to believe possession of a controlled substance was being committed. Workman v. State, 2019 WY 128, 454 P.3d 162,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 12

8 (Wyo. 2019);

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(December 18, 2019).

Free exercise of religion. —

Defendant challenging state drug laws on free exercise grounds failed to establish that statutes were anything other than valid and neutral laws of general applicability. Trujillo v. State, 2 P.3d 567,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2000).

Double Jeopardy was Inapplicable. —

Unpublished decision:

State prisoner was not entitled to habeas relief under 28 U.S.C.S. § 2241 because his Double Jeopardy Clause rights were not violated by the refusal of the Wyoming Board of Parole to hold a parole revocation proceeding while he was serving an Arizona sentence after he had absconded while on parole for convictions under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

35-7-1033

and

35-7-1031

. The Double Jeopardy Clause was inapplicable in that the prisoner was serving two separate sentences for convictions in two different states.
Vonkrosigk v. Schriro, 384 Fed. Appx. 812,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 13412

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2010).

Competency.—

Because defendant did not challenged the trial court's finding that he was competent to enter his Alford plea to felony possession of methamphetamine, any alleged error in the failure to suspend proceedings for a competency evaluation was ultimately inconsequential; defendant's motion to suspend the proceeding did not, by itself, compel the district court to suspend proceedings for a competency evaluation. Marshall v. State, 2016 WY 119, 385 P.3d 304,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2016).

Requirements under this section. —

All that is required to constitute the completed crime under this section is knowledge that one is dealing with a controlled substance, coupled with a completed delivery of that contraband. Seymour v. State, 949 P.2d 881,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1997).

It is unlawful “to … deliver” defines general intent crime.

Once a delivery takes place and the crime of delivery is charged, then the offense takes on the characteristics of a general intent crime and an instruction on specific intent is not necessary; the inference thereupon arises that the defendant intended that which resulted. Dorador v. State, 573 P.2d 839,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1978).

“It is unlawful … to … possess with intent to … deliver” defines specific intent crime.

When only the crime of possession with intent to deliver a controlled substance is charged, and there is no physically completed delivery, the offense is a specific intent crime. Dorador v. State, 573 P.2d 839,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1978).

Fatal variance in information. —

Where defendant who lived in California sold drugs to Wyoming residents in California, to be sold in Wyoming, and was convicted of conspiracy with intent to deliver methamphetamine, but the information alleged that “the conspiratorial agreement occurred in Wyoming or defendant conspired to commit an act beyond the State of Wyoming,” the failure to include an element of the offense charged in the information, that a conspiracy occurred that was intended to have had an effect in Wyoming, was a fatal variance, which a detailed affidavit could not cure. Estrada-Sanchez v. State, 2003 WY 45, 66 P.3d 703,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2003).

Elements of delivery. —

The court rejected defendant's claim that his mind was unsullied by unlawful intent at the time he delivered what he knew to be marijuana to an undercover officer, because impurity of thought is not an element of the crime of delivery of a controlled substance under this section. Seymour v. State, 949 P.2d 881,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1997).

This section and §

35-7-1042

(conspiracy) are directed at separate evils.

The delivery statute targets the delivery of drugs while the conspiracy statute is directed at prevention of partnerships in crime. Refusal to merge counts under the two statutes would therefore not involve a double jeopardy violation.
Dorador v. State, 768 P.2d 1049,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1989).

This section not lesser included offense of §

6-5-208

. —

Taking or passing controlled substances into a jail may be proven without necessarily proving possession of a controlled substance; therefore, possession of a controlled substance, in violation of § 35-7-1031(c), is not necessarily included in the offense of taking or passing a controlled substance into a jail in violation of §

6-5-208

.Paramo v. State, 896 P.2d 1342,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1995).

Evidence sufficient to convict.—

Evidence was sufficient to prove that defendant constructively possessed marijuana found in the trunk of a car in which defendant was a passenger because the smell of raw marijuana in the passenger compartment and the evidence on defendant’s phone demonstrated that defendant knew there was marijuana in the car. Furthermore, the text messages and photographs on the phone and defendant’s own trial testimony proved defendant exercised dominion and control over the marijuana by preparing it for sale and making plans to sell it in Indiana. Pyles v. State, 2020 WY 13, 456 P.3d 926,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2020).

Prosecution's burden where defendant charged with delivery. —

Where defendant is charged with delivery of a controlled substance, the burden is on the prosecution to establish, beyond a reasonable doubt, that the defendant “intentionally committed the act.” Dorador v. State, 573 P.2d 839,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1978).

Basis for sentencing decision. —

Defendant was properly sentenced to 6 to 10 years on the marijuana charge and 3 to 10 years on the methamphetamine charge, to be served consecutively. In light of defendant's failure to object to the presentence investigation report which contained his prior criminal history and in light of his taped statements to police claiming to be a significant drug dealer in the area, the appellate court saw no reliance by the trial court on prosecutorial misconduct in formulating its sentencing decision. Manes v. State, 2004 WY 70, 92 P.3d 289,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. July 13, 2004).

Where defendant had adequate opportunity to respond to information offered by the prosecutor at his sentencing hearing that was not in the presentence report, including a drug enforcement agent's testimony that defendant was a well-known local methamphetamine supplier, and where the court relied on such information in rejecting defendant's request for probation or a lesser sentence, defendant's due process rights were not violated because such evidence was reliable, and the sentence was well below the statutory maximum of 20 years set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(a)(i).
Capellen v. State, 2007 WY 107, 161 P.3d 1076,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2007).

Prosecutors remarks prejudicial. —

Where the prosecutor's repeated remarks, in the face of sustained objections, were a blatant invitation to the jurors to convict defendant, not on the evidence but because of their fear and disapproval of drug dealers in general, the statements undermine the confidence in the fairness of the verdict and there is a substantial likelihood that defendant may have enjoyed a more favorable verdict had the statements not been made. Gayler v. State, 957 P.2d 855,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1998).

Evidence sufficient to conclude intent to deliver controlled substances. —

See Patterson v. State, 691 P.2d 253,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 471 U.S. 1020, 105 S. Ct. 2048, 85 L. Ed. 2d 311, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 2663 (U.S. 1985), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine where defendant, who had admittedly purchased methamphetamine earlier in the day, was present in a hotel room with two females to “get high” and to “party”. A fanny pack on defendant's person contained, inter alia, a small digital scale containing a white powder residue, eight small baggies with a white powder residue that a forensic chemist later testified was methamphetamine, and 112 unused baggies. Grissom v. State, 2005 WY 132, 121 P.3d 127,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's convictions for possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine, possession of methamphetamine, possession of marijuana, and possession of oxycodone because the drugs were found beneath the car seat in which defendant had been sitting, defendant was under the influence of a controlled substance, he had smoked marijuana earlier in the day, he attempted to evade law enforcement, he changed his story several times, he was carrying a large amount of cash, he refused to identify himself, and he ran when law enforcement attempted to arrest him. An expert witness testified that the scales, packaging material, the quantities of methamphetamine found, and the amount of money defendant was carrying were indicative of someone engaged in drug trafficking.
Dettloff v. State, 2007 WY 29, 152 P.3d 376,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2007).

Where police searched a pickup truck in which defendant was a passenger after receiving a report that defendant was selling drugs out of a truck, and the officer found empty baggies, a scale, and 3.99 grams of methamphetamine; as well as a syringe and a wad of cash in defendant's coat, the evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of possessing a controlled substance with intent to deliver and two counts of possession of a controlled substance in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-7-1031

; defendant had exclusive possession of the truck immediately preceding the discovery of the methamphetamine and other drug items.
Cureton v. State, 2007 WY 168, 169 P.3d 549,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2007).

Corroborating evidence not necessary. —

Where the record showed that numerous witnesses admitted to using and selling methamphetamine (meth) which they bought from defendant, defendant's conviction of conspiracy to deliver a controlled substance, methamphetamine, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

35-7-1042

, 35-7-1031(a)(i), was affirmed because the evidence was sufficient to find that defendant committed the crime alleged in that each of the accomplicetconspirators gave direct testimony at trial, thus, no corroborating evidence was required. Adams v. State, 2003 WY 152, 79 P.3d 526,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2003).

Conspiracy to deliver controlled substance. —

Testimony of informant that defendant agreed to procure morphine for her, recording of discussions between informant and defendant throughout the course of their transaction, and defendant's statements to investigators that he was on his way to get morphine but changed his mind when he discovered he was being followed constituted sufficient evidence for jury to conclude defendant had an agreement with another person to violate the controlled substances act. Martinez v. State, 943 P.2d 1178,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1997).

Subject matter jurisdiction over conspiracy. —

The trial court had jurisdiction over a prosecution for conspiracy to deliver a controlled substance, conspiracy to possess a controlled substance with intent to deliver, and conspiracy to possess a controlled substance where the defendant was stopped on a highway in Colorado while en route to deliver marijuana to a coperpetrator in Wyoming, notwithstanding that the conspiracies were not entered into in Wyoming and that the defendant committed no criminal acts in Wyoming, as there was an intent for the conspiracies to have an effect in Wyoming. Marquez v. State, 12 P.3d 711,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 2000).

Constitutionally sufficient showing of probable cause. —

See Guerra v. State, 897 P.2d 447,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1995).

Trial court did not err in denying defendant's motion to suppress drug evidence, where police officer's continued detention of defendant after he was stopped for speeding was lawful, in that the officer's investigation of potential unauthorized use of rental car was a reasonably sufficient reason to detain him, and defendant voluntarily consented to a search of his luggage.
Hembree v. State, 2006 WY 127, 143 P.3d 905,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2006).

Intent inferred. —

Where there was undisputed circumstantial evidence that a vehicle containing objectionable drugs belonged to defendant and had been in his control immediately prior to his arrest and that he at that time appeared to be under the influence of drugs and had previously been in the possession of them, even suggesting that a mother use them on her three-year-old child, intent under this section may be inferred. Deeter v. State, 500 P.2d 68,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1972).

There is no technical definition necessary for intent or for delivery under this section.

Sims v. State, 530 P.2d 1176,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1975).

Word “or” in subsection (a). —

It is significant that the legislature used the disjunctive “or” in subsection (a), thereby indicating that a violation of any of the mentioned prohibitions was a crime. Dorador v. State, 520 P.2d 230,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1974).

History of the law of specific intent in Wyoming. —

See Stuebgen v. State, 548 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1976).

Intent is essential element. —

Where the charge is possession with intent to deliver, it is indisputable that the intent to deliver is just as essential for the prosecution to prove with competent evidence as is the possession. Stuebgen v. State, 548 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1976).

Purchaser of narcotics is not accomplice of defendant charged with selling

such narcotics. Wheeler v. State, 691 P.2d 599,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1984).

Reasonableness of detention at traffic stop. —

The reasonableness of the detention is to be measured by whether the police acted diligently under all the circumstances of the case and whether the detention involved delay unnecessary to a legitimate police inquiry. State v. Welch, 873 P.2d 601,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. May 25, 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. May 25, 1994).

Even when considering the fact that a patrol car's lights remained flashing and that there were two uniformed officers present, under the totality of the circumstances, a defendant's consent to a second round of questions and subsequent dog sniff search was voluntary because the initial traffic stop was brief, the trooper's conduct was professional, courteous, and non-coercive throughout the length of the entire encounter, and the consents given by the defendant were unhesitant and immediate.
Latta v. State, 2009 WY 35, 202 P.3d 1069,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2009).

Trooper was permitted to stop defendant's vehicle after observing a cracked windshield, his questions to defendant and the passenger concerning their travel plans were acceptable, and the initial four-minute detention was not unreasonably prolonged. Because the traffic stop did not violate defendant's Fourth Amendment rights, he was not entitled to suppress evidence of methamphetamine and a digital scale seized from the vehicle or evidence of 23 bindles of cocaine seized from his person; defendant was convicted upon a plea of guilty to felony possession of methamphetamine with intent to deliver and felony possession of cocaine with intent to deliver in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(a)(i).
Lovato v. State, 2010 WY 38, 228 P.3d 55,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2010).

Where an informant told a law enforcement agent that he was purchasing methamphetamine from three men staying at a local motel, the agent went to the motel, where he saw one of the men put something into a vehicle and drive away; when the agent saw the driver turn a corner without signaling, the agent was permitted to conduct a traffic stop under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 4. Therefore, the district court denied defendant's motion to suppress evidence of his backpack found in the car containing 20 grams of methamphetamine, 5 grams of cocaine, a digital scale, several razor blades, and packaging material; defendant was properly convicted of two counts of possession of a controlled substance in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(c)(ii) and two counts of possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(a)(i).
Hernandez v. State, 2010 WY 33, 227 P.3d 315,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2010).

In a case in which defendant entered a conditional guilty plea to one count of possession of marijuana, the facts showed defendant knew he was not being detained and, despite being informed he was not required to answer the trooper’s question. The district court properly determined the trooper’s contact with defendant was consensual and accordingly properly denied defendant’s motion to suppress. Kennison v. State, 2018 WY 46, 417 P.3d 146,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2018).

A continuous chain of possession

is necessary in establishing a proper foundation for the admissibility of a controlled substance. Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1356,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 419 U.S. 1055, 95 S. Ct. 637, 42 L. Ed. 2d 652, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 3665 (U.S. 1974).

Establishing chain of custody. —

Where there is no evidence of any tampering, alteration or other irregularity with regard to drug samples, the chain of custody is adequately established. Le Beau v. State, 589 P.2d 1292,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1979).

Defendant lacked standing to challenge the search. —

Defendant failed to carry his burden of showing that he had any possessory interest in the vehicle at the time of the search, thus failing to demonstrate a legitimate expectation of privacy, the consequence of which was a lack of standing by defendant to challenge the search. Putnam v. State, 995 P.2d 632,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2000).

Where an informant told law enforcement officers that he had recently been in defendant's residence and purchased methamphetamine from defendant the night before, a deputy went to the home of defendant's fiancee's mother and observed a vehicle in the driveway matching the informant's description of the car; during a search of the vehicle, the deputy found drug paraphernalia and more than 20 ounces of marijuana. Defendant lacked standing to challenge the search of his fiancee's vehicle because he had no expectation of privacy in the vehicle; following the denial of his suppression motion, defendant entered a nolo contendere plea to conspiracy to distribute marijuana and possession of marijuana with intent to deliver in violation of this section.
Miller v. State, 2009 WY 125, 217 P.3d 793,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2009).

Reasonable suspicion and probable cause. —

There was a reasonable, articulable suspicion of illegal activity which justified defendant's detention and frisk search, and the arrest of defendant was supported by probable cause based on the location of the drugs and defendant's access and control over that location. Putnam v. State, 995 P.2d 632,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2000).

Motion to suppress was properly denied because a search did not violate the defendants'
rights under the U.S. Const. amend. IV or under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 4; a dog sniff was justified by a reasonably articulable suspicion of illegal activity, and the dog's alert provided the officer with probable cause to search the trunk.
Yoeuth v. State, 2009 WY 61, 206 P.3d 1278,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2009).

Defendant's constitutional rights were not violated when an officer detained defendant for a canine drug sniff because a past-due car rental agreement, defendant's unusual travel plans, the presence of oven cooking bags on the front passenger seat of defendant's vehicle, and defendant's unusual nervousness justified the officer's suspicion that defendant was engaging in illegal activities; hence, defendant's conviction for possession with intent to deliver marijuana, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(a)(ii), was proper.
Sutton v. State, 2009 WY 148, 220 P.3d 784,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2009).

Trailer ball mounted in a place that partially obstructed a license plate from an officer's view was a traffic violation that gave the officer probable cause to conduct a traffic stop; therefore, defendant was not entitled to suppress evidence of marijuana and a pipe he surrendered to the officer during the stop. Defendant was properly convicted on a conditional guilty plea to possession of a controlled substance in violation of this section.
Parks v. State, 2011 WY 19, 247 P.3d 857,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2011).

Probable cause existed to issue warrant. —

Probable cause existed to issue search warrant where the issuing judge learned from the affidavit of a trained and experienced law enforcement officer that juvenile suspects in a criminal case had, against their penal interests, admitted an attempt to steal marijuana from defendant, the juveniles had learned of the marijuana grow operation from defendant's son, they identified the location of the operation, power company records indicated an inordinate use of electricity on defendant's property consistent with a grow operation, and defendant's criminal history revealed previous controlled substance convictions, including ones for illegal manufacture of marijuana. Kitzke v. State, 2002 WY 147, 55 P.3d 696,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 2002).

Warrantless search proper. —

It was permissible to search without a warrant based upon reasonable cause to belief that the evidence of the theft could be found in defendant's vehicle. Callaway v. State, 954 P.2d 1365,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1998).

In a prosecution for felony possession of a controlled substance, the trial court properly denied the defendant's motion to suppress evidence seized from her vehicle after her arrest on an outstanding traffic warrant since: (1) a search of the passenger compartment of her vehicle incident to that arrest was appropriate under federal law, (2) the defendant failed to raise a state constitutional issue below, and (3) it was questionable whether a recent Wyoming supreme court opinion could be retrospectively applied to the search at issue. Bailey v. State, 12 P.3d 173,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 2000).

Methamphetamine and marijuana discovered during a vehicle search were improperly suppressed; an external dog sniff provided probable cause to believe that the vehicle contained contraband, and there was no need to show exigent circumstances in order to justify the warrantless search. State v. Williams, 2004 WY 53, 90 P.3d 85,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2004).

Where officers received an urgent, garbled radio transmission at 4:30 a.m. from defendant's wife, an emergency medical technician (EMT), and went to their home to locate the EMT where they found a system for growing mushrooms in a bedroom,
the search of the home was constitutional because the emergency assistance exception applied; the officers were acting reasonably when they investigated the possible emergency and properly limited their efforts to determining whether anyone was in need of assistance rather than investigating a crime.
Moulton v. State, 2006 WY 152, 148 P.3d 38,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2006).

Where unlawful drugs were found in premises not occupied exclusively by the defendant,

and nothing more is shown, the evidence is circumstantial and insufficient because it does not exclude every reasonable hypothesis except that of guilt. Neuroth v. State, 524 P.2d 590,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1974).

Labeling defendant as “pusher.” —

If testimony of narcotic offenses on other occasions have no probative value except to show a propensity on the part of the defendant to commit that kind of crime, the labeling of a defendant who was charged with possession of marihuana with intent to deliver as a “pusher” is much more than merely testifying to an earlier transaction involving narcotics, as the label implies that the defendant was a professional seller of narcotics, engaged in that unsavory occupation for a substantial period of time. Dorador v. State, 520 P.2d 230,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1974).

Where defense of entrapment is possibility. —

In a prosecution for crimes of possession with intent to deliver marihuana and delivery of marihuana, where the defense of entrapment was a possibility, it was prejudicial error for the state to deny permission to the accused to interview the individual who had contacted the accused and arranged for and was present at the sales transaction, who was the principal participating witness at trial and who, at the time of the trial, had been charged with possession of marihuana and hoped to be benefited by cooperating with the attorney general's office but who had been referred to by the prosecuting attorney as merely an informer. Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1286,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1974), commented on in 10 Land & Water L. Rev. 293 (1975).

Investigatory drug snares immunized. —

The acquisition, use and sale for investigatory purposes, without registration, of marijuana did not violate defendant's right to due process where the technical violations at issue were implicitly immunized under §

35-7-1043

as legitimate investigatory drug snares. Rivera v. State, 846 P.2d 1,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1993).

Proof necessary to convict for possession of illicit drugs. —

In order to convict for possession of illicit drugs, the prosecution must establish that the accused either individually or jointly with another exercised dominion and control over the substance, had knowledge of its presence and had knowledge that the substance was a controlled substance; constructive possession is all that is necessary and such may be proved by circumstantial evidence linking together a series of facts. Wise v. State, 654 P.2d 116,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1982).

“Possession” of substance in physical custody of another. —

If a defendant is sufficiently associated with the persons having physical custody of a controlled substance so that he is able, without difficulty, to cause the drug to be produced for a customer, he can be found by a jury to have dominion and control over the drug and, therefore, possession. Wise v. State, 654 P.2d 116,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1982).

A person who, in one transaction, possesses with intent to deliver and delivers

a controlled substance commits a single violation of the statute and should incur only one punishment. Dorador v. State, 520 P.2d 230,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1974).

If a person is charged with delivery of a controlled substance and possession of the same substance with intent to deliver, the latter is embraced in the former. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

Possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver and unlawful delivery of a controlled substance are under this section separate and distinct. Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1356,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 419 U.S. 1055, 95 S. Ct. 637, 42 L. Ed. 2d 652, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 3665 (U.S. 1974).

Possession and attempted possession may be charged and tried together. —

It was proper for the indictment to charge possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver and attempted possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver, and it was also proper that both alleged violations be tried in one proceeding because they were of similar character and based on the same act or transaction or, at the very least, on two or more acts or transactions connected together or constituting part of a common scheme or plan. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976). See Rule 11, W.R. Cr. P.

Prescription justifying lawful possession. —

In a prosecution for possession of a controlled substance in violation of subsection (c), it is not necessary for the state to prove that the defendant did not have a prescription justifying lawful possession; the burden of that exception is on the defendant. Pool v. State, 2001 WY 8, 17 P.3d 1285,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2001).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(c) did not exempt defendant from criminal liability even if defendant obtained a legitimate medical marijuana exception under Colorado law; because Colorado law did not allow a physician to prescribe marijuana possession, a Colorado registry card for the use of medical marijuana was irrelevant to criminal proceedings.
Burns v. State, 2011 WY 5, 246 P.3d 283,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2011), reh'g denied,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. Feb. 23, 2011).

Because a California physician's recommendation to use marijuana for medical purposes was not a valid prescription or medical practitioner's order within the meaning of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(c) and was not a valid defense to the charge of felony possession of marijuana under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(c)(iii), evidence of a medical marijuana card from a California physician was properly excluded as irrelevant under Wyo. R. Evid. 401, 402; thus, the district court did not deny him his constitutional right under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10 to present a defense.
Bruyette v. State, 2011 WY 99, 253 P.3d 512,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 2011).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(c) did not exempt defendant from criminal liability even if defendant obtained a legitimate medical marijuana exception under Colorado law; because Colorado law did not allow a physician to prescribe marijuana possession, a Colorado registry card for the use of medical marijuana was irrelevant to criminal proceedings.
Burns v. State, 2011 WY 5, 246 P.3d 283,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2011), reh'g denied,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. Feb. 23, 2011).

“Or any other substance excluding packaging material.” —

Subsection (d) was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to convict defendant of felony possession of a controlled substance, since the phrase “or any other substance excluding packaging material” is broad enough to have included the weight of water containing methamphetamine found in his possession. Smith v. State, 964 P.2d 421,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1998).

Conviction may only be on one count. —

Where the indictment charged defendant with possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver and attempted possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver, even though both counts could be brought under the same complaint (both counts could be tried at the same time, the same witnesses could testify in the proof of each charge insofar as their testimony was relevant, material and competent, or otherwise admissible, and the same evidence could be received to support each count), the defendant could not be convicted and sentenced to prison for more than one offense. There was but one transaction, one common scheme or plan, and, because one offense was merged with another, the convictions may not be stacked because the result would be to have twice placed the defendant in jeopardy in that he would have received multiple punishment for the same offense at one trial. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

Provisions governing marijuana-related offenses. —

Because marijuana is a schedule I controlled substance under § 35-7-1014(d)(xiii) but is not a “narcotic drug,” as that term is defined by § 35-7-1002(a)(xv), offenses involving marijuana are governed by subsection (a)(ii) rather than subsection (a)(i). Eaton v. State, 660 P.2d 803,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1983).

Dispensing of controlled substance by pharmacist outside of statutory authority. —
